Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.147

Students required to register as sex or kidnapping offenders—Sample policy—Educational materials.

The superintendent of public instruction shall publish on its website, with a link to the safety center web page:

(1) A revised and updated sample policy for schools to follow regarding students required to register as sex or kidnapping offenders; and

(2) Educational materials developed pursuant to RCW 28A.300.145.

[ 2015 c 261 s 13; 2011 c 338 s 6.]